Utah statutes.
38-1a-201.   Establishment of State Construction Registry -- Filing index.

(1)  Subject to receiving adequate funding through a legislative appropriation and contracting with an approved third party vendor as provided in Section 38-1a-202, the division shall establish and maintain the State Construction Registry to:

(a) (i)  assist in protecting public health, safety, and welfare; and

(ii)  promote a fair working environment;

(b)  be overseen by the division with the assistance of the designated agent;

(c)  provide a central repository for all required notices;

(d)  make accessible, by way of an Internet website:

(i)  the filing and review of required notices; and

(ii)  the transmitting of building permit information under Subsection 38-1a-205(1) and the reviewing of that information;

(e)  accommodate:

(i)  electronic filing of required notices and electronic transmitting of building permit information described in Subsection (1)(d)(ii); and

(ii)  the filing of required notices by alternate means, including United States mail, telefax, or any other method as the division provides by rule;

(f) (i)  provide electronic notification for up to three email addresses for each interested person who requests to receive notification under Section 38-1a-204 from the designated agent; and

(ii)  provide alternate means of providing notification to a person who makes a filing by alternate means, including United States mail, telefax, or any other method as the division prescribes by rule; and

(g)  provide hard-copy printing of electronic receipts for an individual filing evidencing the date and time of the individual filing and the content of the individual filing.

(2)  The designated agent shall index filings in the registry by:

(a)  the name of the owner;

(b)  the name of the original contractor;

(c)  subdivision, development, or other project name, if any;

(d)  lot or parcel number;

(e)  the address of the project property;

(f)  entry number;

(g)  the name of the county in which the project property is located;

(h)  for construction projects that are not government projects:

(i)  the tax parcel identification number of each parcel included in the project property; and

(ii)  the building permit number;

(i)  for government projects, the government project-identifying information; and

(j)  any other identifier that the division considers reasonably appropriate in collaboration with the designated agent.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 278, 2012 General Session

